Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201848-606.01
Commissioner; office space; acquire; approval of Department of Administrative Services.

The commissioner, with the written consent of the Department of Administrative Services, is authorized and empowered to use any funds available under either subdivision (1)(a) or (1)(b) of section 48-621, for the purpose of acquiring suitable office space within the corporate limits of the state capital city for the administration of the Employment Security Law. Office space may be acquired by purchase, by contract, or in any other manner including the right to use such funds, or any part thereof, to assist in financing the construction of any building erected by the State of Nebraska or any of its agencies. If the Department of Labor assists in financing the construction of any building erected by the State of Nebraska or any of its agencies under a lease or contract between the commissioner and the State of Nebraska or such other agency, the Department of Labor shall continue to occupy such space rent free after the cost of financing such building has been liquidated. The commissioner, upon approval by the Department of Administrative Services, is authorized and empowered to use any such funds to acquire suitable office space for local employment offices anywhere in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1953, c. 167, § 4(2), p. 530;

Laws 1955, c. 190, § 2, p. 540;

Laws 1961, c. 239, § 2, p. 713;

Laws 1975, LB 359, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 747, § 2;

Laws 1985, LB 339, § 7;

Laws 1995, LB 1, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 953, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB172, § 9.